Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Environmental Quality, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Air quality.................................  $ 26,566,173
(2) Water quality............................  $ 47,345,738
(3) Land quality..............................  $ 2,943,780
(4) Agency management.................  $ 2,296,337
(5) Debt service ..............................  $ 6,155,503
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the
proceeds of bonds for the  Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation
and air quality grants, drinking water protection,  laboratory accreditation and woodstove
grants and for smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds  and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Environ-
mental Quality, for the following purposes:
(1) Air quality................................. $128,108,307
(2) Water quality ............................ $ 40,413,657
(3) Land quality.............................. $124,002,267
(4) Agency management ................. $ 54,370,073
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,038,076 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Parks and Natural Resources
Fund to the Department  of Environmental Quality for activities and projects to implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the following  expenditures by the
Department of Environmental Quality are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for debt service and debt  service administrative costs related to the
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and the Pollution Control Fund; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5520 (SB 5520-A) Page 1
(2) Expenditures made for loans from  the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and
loans from the Pollution Control Fund.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2025 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Environmental Quality, for the following purposes:
(1) Air quality................................. $135,622,777
(2) Water quality ............................ $ 19,083,392
(3) Land quality.............................. $ 9,828,891
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5520 (SB 5520-A) Page 2